Arkansas, session 2025, SB275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 15-75-107 and 15-75-108 are repealed.
15-75-107. Odorization of gas.
All liquefied petroleum gases shall be effectively odorized with a
distinctive agent at the time of manufacture by the use of an approved
chemical agent of such character as to positively indicate the presence of
gas in concentrations not to exceed one-fifth (⅕) of the lowest limit of
flammability of such gas, except where used in connection with a chemical or
other manufacturing processes in which it would prove harmful and would serve
no useful purpose as a warning agent.

15-75-108. Dealers' safety meetings for employees.
Each dealer authorized to engage in the liquefied petroleum gas
business generally in this state, in conjunction with representatives of the
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, an insurance company, or other recognized
safety organization, shall conduct with all employees handling liquefied
petroleum gases one (1) general safety meeting during each twelve-month
period.

*CRH108*
02/21/2025 2:57:48 PM CRH108

SB275
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 75, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-75-113. Training.
(a) The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board may require initial, recurring,
and annual training for employees of all permit holders under this section.
(b) A permit holder shall provide proof of training when submitting
annual permit renewal requests.
(c) A certified employee who fails to attend the required training is
subject to a certification suspension or revocation.
(d) The board may promulgate rules to establish training requirements
for employees of all permit holders under this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-75-207 is amended to read as follows:
15-75-207. Rules.
(a) The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board is empowered to make reasonable
rules to carry out the provisions of this subchapter. Such rules shall have
the force and effect of law may promulgate rules to carry out the functions,
powers, and duties conferred on the board by law.
(b) In addition to the functions, powers, and duties conferred and
imposed upon the board by this subchapter, and the regulation of its own
procedure and carrying out its functions, powers, and duties, it shall have
the authority from time to time to make, amend, and enforce all reasonable
rules not inconsistent with law, which will aid in the performance of any of
the functions, powers, or duties conferred or imposed upon it by law The
board may adopt through rulemaking the National Fire Protection Association
Standards, in whole or in part.
(c) All permanent rules promulgated for the regulation of liquefied
petroleum gases as published in the state code governing liquefied petroleum
gas containers and equipment dated May 1, 1964, shall remain in full force
and effect until changed, altered, amended, or abolished by the board.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-75-208 is repealed.
15-75-208. Standards for containers, systems, etc.
The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board shall provide additional standards or
specifications for containers, systems, appliances, and appurtenances, as may
be reasonably necessary for the public safety. The standards or
02/21/2025 2:57:48 PM CRH108

SB275
specifications are to be set forth in the rules of the state code governing
liquefied petroleum gas containers and equipment.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-75-304(d)(1), concerning the authority
of the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board to accept a reciprocal state's
transportation and delivery examination, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The board may accept as its own a reciprocal state's
transportation and delivery examination employee certification for a
transport driver only if it contains substantially equivalent requirements as
those required by the board.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 15-75-305(k), concerning the requirement
that an applicant for a class one permit attend a forty-hour basic course in
liquefied petroleum gas, is amended to read as follows:
(k)(1) Applicants for a class one permit must attend a forty-hour
basic course in liquefied petroleum gas, as prescribed by the board, prior to
the board meeting at which the review of the final action on their
application may be heard.
(2) All owners, managers or officials, and employees connected
to or listed on the class one application must attend the basic initial
training course prior to the board meeting at which the review of their
application may be heard.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-75-308(b)(2), concerning the requirement
that an applicant for a class two permit related to liquefied petroleum gas
provide a certified or notarized financial statement, is repealed.
(2) Must provide a certified or notarized financial statement
which has been compiled within the past sixty (60) days;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 15-75-309(d)(3), concerning the requirement
that an applicant for a class three permit related to liquefied petroleum gas
provide a certified or notarized financial statement, is repealed.
(3) Must provide a certified or notarized financial statement
which has been compiled within the past sixty (60) days; and

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 15-75-311(b)(2), concerning the requirement
02/21/2025 2:57:48 PM CRH108

SB275
that an applicant for a class five permit related to liquefied petroleum gas
provide a certified or notarized financial statement, is repealed.
(2) Must provide a certified or notarized financial statement
which has been compiled within the past sixty (60) days;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 15-75-316(b)(2), concerning the
requirement that an applicant for a class ten permit related to liquefied
petroleum gas provide a certified or notarized financial statement, is
repealed.
(2) Must provide a certified or notarized financial statement
which has been compiled within the past sixty (60) days;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code §§ 15-75-401 — 15-75-403 are repealed.
15-75-401. Vapor pressure.
The vapor pressure of any gases delivered for use in any container
shall not exceed, at one hundred degrees Fahrenheit (100°F), the allowable
pressure for gas to be used in the container as fixed by the manufacturer.

15-75-402. Strength of butane containers.
Each container, except containers designed to operate under
refrigerated or cryogenic conditions, where used in the transportation or
storage of a liquefied petroleum gas mixture known as butane gas shall be
designed and constructed to withstand an internal pressure of not less than
one hundred twenty-five pounds (125 lbs.) per square inch.

15-75-403. Strength of propane containers.
Each container, except containers designed to operate under
refrigerated or cryogenic conditions, where used for the storage or
transportation of a liquefied petroleum gas mixture known as propane gas
shall be designed and constructed to withstand an internal pressure of not
less than two hundred fifty pounds (250 lbs.) per square inch.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 15-75-407 is repealed.
15-75-407. Retail sellers to furnish account statements to certain
customers.
(a) Each person, corporation, partnership, association, or other
02/21/2025 2:57:48 PM CRH108

SB275
entity engaging in the business of selling liquefied petroleum gas at retail
in the state shall furnish within the first twenty (20) days of each calendar
month to each retail customer in the state having a credit balance of twenty
dollars ($20.00) or more a statement of the customer's account showing that
credit balance.
(b) The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board shall see that every propane
dealer doing business in the State of Arkansas receives a copy of this
section and shall monitor compliance with this section.
(c) The failure of any person, corporation, partnership, association,
or other entity to comply with the provisions of this section or the rules of
the board adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall constitute
grounds for the revocation or suspension of the license or permit of each
person or entity to engage in the business of selling liquefied petroleum gas
at retail in this state.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(32), concerning the enumeration
of special revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(32) Liquefied petroleum gas board Petroleum Gas Board filing
fees, inspection fees, registration fees, permits, and certificates of
competency, as enacted by Acts 1965, No. 31, known as the “Liquefied
Petroleum Gas Board Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 15-75-101 — 15-
75-108, 15-75-110, 15-75-201 — 15-75-204, §15-75-205 [repealed], §§15-75-206
— 15-75-209, 15-75-301 — 15-75-321, and 15-75-401 — 15-75-405 15-75-101 — 15-
75-106, 15-75-110, 15-75-201 — 15-75-204, 15-75-206, 15-75-207, 15-75-209,
15-75-301 — 15-75-321, 15-75-404, and 15-75-405;

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
Sections 1, 4, 6, 11, 12, and 13 shall be effective on and after April
1, 2026.







02/21/2025 2:57:48 PM CRH108